District of Columbia statutes.
7-2813

Trial.

(a)

Unless otherwise provided, the conduct of any civil trial commenced pursuant to § 7-2812 shall be governed by the Rules of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia.

(b)

In such trial, the complaint of a violation of this chapter shall be brought in the name of the District of Columbia by the Corporation Counsel. The burden of proof shall be upon the District of Columbia and no violation of this chapter may be established except upon proof by a preponderance of the evidence.

Sept. 26, 1980, D.C. Law 3-107, § 14, 27 DCR 3760
This section is referenced in § 7-2812.
1981 Ed., § 6-3113.